Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$10,073,617 to  the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife activities to implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$7,640,031 to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for activities  and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 3. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$10,636,822 to the State Department of Agriculture for activities and  projects to implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$5,322,214 to the  Department of Environmental Quality for activities and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,326,314 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board from lottery moneys
deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund established under ORS 541.945,
for operating expenses, activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the
Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Watershed En-
hancement Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 17,926
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 3,052,720
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement
Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 2,473,697
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 42,837,066
SECTION 8. (1) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall establish by rule a
process for allocating on  a quarterly basis available moneys in the Natural Resources Sub-
account of the Parks and Natural Resources  Fund, established under ORS 541.942, to fulfill
the biennial allocations made in this 2019 Act. Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, all quarterly allocations shall be set at one-eighth of the biennial allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys transferred  from the Oregon State Lottery Fund to the
Parks and  Natural Resources Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations es-
tablished under subsection (1) of this section, the allocations shall be reduced proportionately
by amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 9. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 2